Vermont, session 2025-2026, H479.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Vermont Rental Housing Improvement Program * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 699 is amended to read:
§ 699. VERMONT RENTALHOUSING IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM
(a) Creation of Program.
* * *
(5)(A) The Department may cooperate with and subgrant funds to State
agencies and governmental subdivisions and public and private organizations
in order to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
(B) Solely with regards to actions undertaken pursuant to this
subdivision, entities carrying out the provisions of this section, including
grantees, subgrantees, and contractors of the State, shall be exempt from the
provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 73 (licensed lenders, mortgage brokers,
mortgage loan originators, sales finance companies, and loan solicitation
companies).
* * *
(d) Program requirements applicable to grants and forgivable loans.
(1)(A) A grant or loan shall not exceed:
(i) $70,000.00 per unit, for rehabilitation or creation of an eligible
rental housing unit meeting the applicable building accessibility requirements
under the Vermont Access Rules; or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 3 of 38
(ii) $50,000.00 per unit, for rehabilitation or creation of any other
eligible rental housing unit. Up to an additional $20,000.00 per unit may be
made available for specific elements that collectively bring the unit to the
visitable standard outlined in the rules adopted by the Vermont Access Board.
* * *
(e) Program requirements applicable to grants and five-year forgivable
loans. For a grant or five-year forgivable loan awarded through the Program,
the following requirements apply for a minimum period of five years:
(1) A landlord shall coordinate with nonprofit housing partners and
local coordinated entry homelessness service organizations approved by the
Department to identify potential tenants.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection (e), a
landlord shall lease the unit to a household that is:
(i) exiting homelessness, including any individual under 25 years
of age who secures housing through a master lease held by a youth service
provider on behalf of individuals under 25 years of age;
(ii) actively working with an immigrant or refugee resettlement
program; or
(iii) composed of at least one individual with a disability who
receives or is eligible approved to receive Medicaid-funded home and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 4 of 38
community based home-and community-based services or Social Security
Disability Insurance; or
(iv) with approval from the Department in writing, an
organization that will hold a master lease that explicitly states the unit will be
used in service of the populations described in this subsection (e).
* * *
(4)(A) A landlord may convert a grant to a forgivable loan upon
approval of the Department and the housing organization that approved the
grant.
(B) A landlord who converts a grant to a forgivable loan shall receive
a 10-percent prorated credit for loan forgiveness for each year in which the
landlord participates in the Program.
(f) Requirements applicable to 10-year forgivable loans. For a 10-year
forgivable loan awarded through the Program, the following requirements
apply for a minimum period of 10 years:
(1) A landlord shall coordinate with nonprofit housing partners and
local coordinated entry organizations to identify potential tenants The total
cost of rent for the unit, including utilities not covered by rent payments, shall
not exceed the applicable fair market rent established by the Department of
Housing and Urban Development, except that a landlord may accept a housing
voucher that exceeds fair market rent, if available.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 5 of 38
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection (f), a
landlord shall lease the unit to a household that is:
(i) exiting homelessness, including any individual under 25 years
of age who secures housing through a master lease held by a youth service
provider on behalf of individuals under 25 years of age;
(ii) actively working with an immigrant or refugee resettlement
program; or
(iii) composed of at least one individual with a disability who is
eligible to receive Medicaid-funded home and community based services.
(B) If, upon petition of the landlord, the Department or the housing
organization that issued the grant determines that a household under
subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (f) is not available to lease the unit, then
the landlord shall lease the unit:
(i) to a household with an income equal to or less than 80 percent
of area median income; or
(ii) if such a household is unavailable, to another household with
the approval of the Department or housing organization.
(3)(A) A landlord shall accept any housing vouchers that are available
to pay all, or a portion of, the tenant’s rent and utilities.
(B) If no housing voucher or federal or State subsidy is available, the
cost of rent for the unit, including utilities not covered by rent payments, shall

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 6 of 38
not exceed the applicable fair market rent established by the Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
(4) The Department shall forgive 10 percent of the a prorated amount of
a forgivable loan for each year a landlord participates in the loan program.
(g) Minimum funding for grants and five-year forgivable loans.
(1) Annually, the Department shall establish a minimum allocation of
funding set aside to be used for five-year grants or forgivable loans to serve
eligible households pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. Remaining
funds may be used for either five-year grants or forgivable loans or 10-year
forgivable loans pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. The set aside shall
be a minimum of 30 percent of funds disbursed annually.
(2) The Department shall consult with the Agency of Human Services to
evaluate factors in establishing the amount of the set aside, including:
(A) the availability of housing vouchers;
(B) the current need for housing for eligible households;
(C) the ability and desire of landlords to house eligible households;
(D) the support services available for landlords; and
(E) the prior uptake and success rates for participating landlords.
(3) The Department shall coordinate with the local Coordinated Entry
Lead Agencies and HomeOwnership Centers to direct referrals for those

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 7 of 38
individuals or families prioritized to be housed pursuant to the five-year grants
or forgivable loans.
(4) Funds from the set aside not utilized after one year shall become
available for 10-year forgivable loans.
(5) The Department shall annually publish the amount of the set aside
on its website.
* * *
(i) Creation of the Vermont Rental Housing Improvement Program
Revolving Fund. Funds repaid or returned to the Department from forgivable
loans or grants funded by the Program shall return to the Vermont Rental
Housing Improvement Revolving Fund to be used for Program expenditures
and administrative costs at the discretion of the Department.
(j) Annually, the Department shall submit a report to the House
Committees on Human Services and on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs
regarding the following:
(1) separately, the number of units funded and the number of units
rehabilitated through grants, through a five-year forgivable loan, and through a
10-year forgivable loan;
(2) for grants and five-year forgivable loans, for the first year after the
expiration of the lease requirements outlined in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 8 of 38
section, whether the unit is still occupied by a tenant who meets the
qualifications of that subdivision;
(3) for each program, for the first year after the expiration of the
applicable lease requirements outlined in this section, the amount of rent
charged by the landlord and how that rent compares to fair market rent
established by the Department of Housing and Urban Development; and
(4) the rate of turnover for tenants housed utilizing grants or five-year
forgivable loans and 10-year forgivable loans separately.
* * * MHIR * * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 700 is added to read:
§ 700. VERMONT MANUFACTURED HOME IMPROVEMENT AND
REPAIR PROGRAM
(a) There is created within the Department of Housing and Community
Development the Manufactured Home Improvement and Repair Program. The
Department shall design and implement the Program to award funding to
statewide or regional nonprofit housing organizations, or both, to provide
financial assistance or awards to manufactured homeowners and manufactured
home park owners to improve existing homes, incentivize new slab placement
for prospective homeowners, and incentivize park improvements for infill of
more homes.
(b) The following projects are eligible for funding through the Program:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 9 of 38
(1) The Department may award up to $20,000.00 to owners of
manufactured housing communities to complete small-scale capital needs to
help infill vacant lots with homes, including disposal of abandoned homes, lot
grading and preparation, the siting and upgrading of electrical boxes,
enhancing E-911 safety issues, transporting homes out of flood zones, and
improving individual septic systems. Costs awarded under this subdivision
may also cover legal fees and marketing to help make it easier for home-
seekers to find vacant lots around the State.
(2) The Department may award funding to manufactured homeowners
for which the home is their primary residence to address habitability and
accessibility issues to bring the home into compliance with safe living
conditions.
(3) The Department may award up to $15,000.00 per grant to a
homeowner to pay for a foundation or federal Department of Housing and
Urban Development-approved slab, site preparation, skirting, tie-downs, and
utility connections on vacant lots within a manufactured home community.
(c) The Department may adopt rules, policies, and guidelines to aid in
enacting the Program.
* * * Vermont Infrastructure Sustainability Fund * * *
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. chapter 119, subchapter 6 is amended to read:
Subchapter 6. Special Funds

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 10 of 38
* * *
§ 4686. VERMONT INFRASTRUCTURE SUSTAINABILITY FUND
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Infrastructure Sustainability
Fund within the Vermont Bond Bank.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of the Fund is to provide capital to extend and
increase capacity of water and sewer service and other public infrastructure in
municipalities where lack of extension or capacity is a barrier to housing
development.
(c) Administration. The Vermont Bond Bank may administer the Fund in
coordination with and support from other State agencies, government
component parts, and quasi-governmental agencies.
(d) Program parameters.
(1) The Vermont Bond Bank, in consultation with the Department of
Housing and Community Development, shall develop program guidelines to
effectively implement the Fund.
(2) The program shall provide low-interest loans or bonds to
municipalities to expand infrastructure capacity. Eligible activities include:
(A) preliminary engineering and planning;
(B) engineering design and bid specifications;
(C) construction for municipal waste and wastewater systems;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 11 of 38
(D) transportation investments, including those required by
municipal regulation, the municipality’s official map, designation
requirements, or other planning or engineering identifying complete streets
and transportation and transit related improvements, including improvements
to existing streets; and
(E) other eligible activities as determined by the guidelines produced
by the Vermont Bond Bank in consultation with the Department of Housing
and Community Development.
(e) Application requirements. Eligible project applications shall
demonstrate:
(1) the project will create reserve capacity necessary for new housing
unit development;
(2) the project has a direct link to housing unit production; and
(3) the municipality has a commitment to own and operate the project
throughout its useful life.
(f) Application criteria. In addition to any criteria developed in the
program guidelines, project applications shall be evaluated using the following
criteria:
(1) whether there is a direct connection to proposed or in-progress
housing development with demonstrable progress toward regional housing
targets;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 12 of 38
(2) whether the project is an expansion of an existing system and the
proximity to a designated area;
(3) the project readiness and estimated time until the need for financing;
and
(4) the demonstration of financing for project completion or completion
of a project component.
(g) Award terms. The Vermont Bond Bank, in consultation with the
Department of Housing and Community Development, shall establish award
terms that may include:
(1) the maximum loan or bond amount;
(2) the maximum term of the loan or bond amount;
(3) the time by which amortization shall commence;
(4) the maximum interest rate;
(5) whether the loan is eligible for forgiveness and to what percentage
or amount;
(6) the necessary security for the loan or bond; and
(7) any additional covenants encumbering the improved properties to
further secure the loan or bond.
(h) Revolving fund. Any funds repaid or returned from the Infrastructure
Sustainability Fund shall be deposited into the Fund and used to continue the
program established in this section.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 13 of 38
* * * Universal Design Study Committee * * *
Sec. 4. RESIDENTIALUNIVERSALDESIGN STANDARDS; STUDY
COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Residential Universal Design Study
Committee to explore implementation of statewide universal design standards
for all residential buildings.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) one member of the House of Representatives, who shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) one member of the Senate, who shall be appointed by the Committee
on Committees;
(3) one member, appointed by the Vermont Builders and Remodelers
Association;
(4) one member, appointed by the Vermont Chapter of the American
Institute of Architects;
(5) the Director of Fire Safety or designee;
(6) one member of the Vermont Access Board, appointed by the Chair;
(7) one member, appointed by the Vermont Housing Finance Agency;
(8) one member, appointed by the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Board;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 14 of 38
(9) one member, appointed by the Vermont Center for Independent
Living;
(10) one member, appointed by the Vermont Developmental Disabilities
Council;
(11) the Commissioner of the Department of Housing and Community
Development or designee;
(12) one member, appointed by the Vermont Leagues of Cities and
Towns;
(13) one member, appointed by the Vermont Assessors and Listers
Association;
(14) one member, appointed by the Vermont Association of Realtors;
(15) the Commissioner of the Department of Disabilities, Aging and
Independent Living or designee; and
(16) one member, appointed by ADA Inspections Nationwide, LLC.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall study the development and
implementation of statewide universal design standards for residential
buildings, including identification and analysis of the following issues:
(1) existing federal and state laws regarding the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12101–12213, standards and building codes;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 15 of 38
(2) existing federal, state, and international best practices and standards
addressing accessibility and adaptability characteristics of single-family and
multiunit buildings;
(3) opportunities and challenges for supporting the residential building
industry in meeting universal design standards, including considerations of
workforce education and training;
(4) cost benefits and impacts of adopting a universal design standard for
residential buildings;
(5) opportunities and challenges with enforcement of identified
standards; and
(6) impacts to the valuation and financing of impacted buildings.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Department of Housing and Community
Development.
(e) Report. On or before November 1, 2025, the Committee shall submit a
written report to the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate
Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The member of the House of Representatives shall call the first
meeting of the Committee to occur on or before June 1, 2025.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 16 of 38
(2) The Committee shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Committee shall cease to exist on December 1, 2025.
(g)(1) Compensation and reimbursement. For attendance at meetings
during adjournment of the General Assembly, a legislative member of the
Committee serving in the member’s capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to
per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A.
§ 23 for not more than sixmeetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the General Assembly.
(2) Members of the Committee who are not otherwise compensated for
their time shall be entitled to per diem compensation as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than sixmeetings. These payments shall be
made from monies appropriated to the Committee.
(h) Appropriation. The sum of $15,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Housing and Community Development in
fiscal year 2026 for per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses for
members of the Committee and to engage the services of one or more experts
as necessary to assist the Committee in its work pursuant to this section.
(h) Intent to appropriate. Notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section,
per diems for the cost of attending meetings shall only be available in the event

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 17 of 38
an appropriation is made in fiscal year 2026 from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development for that purpose.
* * * TaxDepartment Housing Data Access * * *
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 5404 is amended to read:
§ 5404. DETERMINATION OF EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX GRAND
LIST
* * *
(b) Annually, on or before August 15, the clerk of a municipality, or the
supervisor of an unorganized town or gore, shall transmit to the Director in an
electronic or other format as prescribed by the Director: education and
municipal grand list data, including exemption information and grand list
abstracts; taxrates; an extract of the assessor database also referred to as a
Computer Assisted Mass Appraisal (CAMA) system or Computer Assisted
Mass Appraisal database; and the total amount of taxes assessed in the town or
unorganized town or gore. The data transmitted shall identify each parcel by a
parcel identification number assigned under a numbering system prescribed by
the Director. Municipalities may continue to use existing numbering systems in
addition to, but not in substitution for, the parcel identification system
prescribed by the Director. If changes or additions to the grand list are made
by the listers or other officials authorized to do so after such abstract has been
so transmitted, such clerks shall forthwith certify the same to the Director.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 18 of 38
* * *
* * * VHFA First-Generation Homebuyer Program and Down Payment
Assistance Program * * *
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 5930u is amended to read:
§ 5930u. TAX CREDIT FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(11) “First-generation homebuyer” means a homebuyer who self-attests
that the homebuyer is an individual:
(A) whose parents or legal guardians:
(i) do not have and during the homebuyer’s lifetime have not had
any residential ownership interest in any state; or
(ii) lost ownership of a home due to foreclosure, short sale, or
deed-in-lieu of foreclosure and have not owned a home since that loss; or
(B) who has at any time been placed in foster care.
* * *
(g) Credit allocation.
(1) In any fiscal year, the allocating agency may award up to:
(A) $400,000.00 in total first-year credit allocations to all applicants
for rental housing projects, for an aggregate limit of $2,000,000.00 over any
given five-year period that credits are available under this subdivision (A).

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 19 of 38
(B) $675,000.00 in total first-year credit allocations for loans or
grants for owner-occupied unit financing or down payment loans as provided
in subdivision (b)(2) of this section consistent with the allocation plan,
including for new construction and manufactured housing, for an aggregate
limit of $3,375,000.00 over any given five-year period that credits are
available under this subdivision (B). Of the total first-year credit allocations
made under this subdivision (B), $250,000.00 shall be used each fiscal year for
manufactured home purchase and replacement.
(C) $250,000.00 in total in total first-year credit allocations for
grants to first-time homebuyers who are also first-generation homebuyers as
provided in subdivision (b)(3)(D) of this section, for an aggregate limit of
$1,250,000.00 over any given five-year period that credits are available under
this subdivision (C).
(2) If the full amount of first-year credits authorized by an award are not
allocated to a taxpayer, the Agency may reclaim the amount not allocated and
re-award such allocations to other applicants, and such re-awards shall not be
subject to the limits set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(h) Credit allocation; Down Payment Assistance Program.
(1) In fiscal year 2016 through fiscal year 2019, the allocating agency
may award up to $125,000.00 in total first-year credit allocations for loans

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 20 of 38
through the Down Payment Assistance Program created in subdivision (b)(2)
of this section.
(2) In fiscal year 2020 through fiscal year 2026, the allocating agency
may award up to $250,000.00 in total first-year credit allocations for loans
through the Down Payment Assistance Program created in subdivision (b)(3)
of this section.
(3) In fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year 2031, the allocating agency
may award up to $250,000.00 in total first-year credit allocations for loans
through the Down Payment Assistance Program created in subdivision (b)(3)
of this section.
Sec. 6. [Deleted.]
* * * Land Bank Report * * *
Sec. 7. DHCD LAND BANK REPORT
(a) On or before November 1, 2025, the Department of Housing and
Community Development shall issue a report to the House Committee on
General and Housing and the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs outlining a legal framework for implementation
of a State land bank. The report shall include proposed legislative language
specific to:
(1) the creation of a statewide land bank;
(2) the authorization of regional or municipal land banks; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 21 of 38
(3) the identification of funding proposals to support the sustainability
of each separate model.
(b) The report shall include an analysis on which option, the creation of a
statewide land bank or the authorization of regional or municipal land banks,
best serves the interest of Vermont communities, including rural communities.
* * * Housing Appeals * * *
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 8502 is amended to read:
§ 8502. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(7) “Person aggrieved” means a person who alleges an injury to a
particularized interest protected by the provisions of law listed in section 8503
of this title, attributable to an act or decision by a district coordinator, District
Commission, the Secretary, an appropriate municipal panel, or the
Environmental Division that can be redressed by the Environmental Division
or the Supreme Court.
* * *
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTALDIVISION
* * *
(b) Planning and zoning chapter appeals.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 22 of 38
(1) Within 30 days of the date of the act or decision, an interested
person, as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4465, or a person aggrieved, who has
participated as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4471 in the municipal regulatory
proceeding under that chapter may appeal to the Environmental Division an
act or decision made under that chapter by a board of adjustment, a planning
commission, or a development review board; provided, however, that
decisions of a development review board under 24 V.S.A. § 4420 with respect
to local Act 250 review of municipal impacts are not subject to appeal but
shall serve as presumptions under chapter 151 of this title.
* * *
(h) De novo hearing. The Environmental Division, applying the
substantive standards that were applicable before the tribunal appealed from,
shall hold a de novo hearing on those issues that have been appealed, except.
For a municipal land use permit application for a housing development, if the
appeal is of a denial, the Environmental Division shall determine if the
application is consistent with the municipal bylaw or land use regulation that
directly affects the property or if the appeal is of an approval, if the application
is inconsistent with the municipal bylaw or land use regulation that directly
affects the property. It shall not be de novo in the case of:
(1) a decision being appealed on the record pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
chapter 117; or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 23 of 38
(2) a decision of the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation
under section 2625 of this title being appealed on the record, in which case the
court shall affirm the decision, unless it finds that the Commissioner did not
have reasonable grounds on which to base the decision.
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:
(1) there shall be no appeal from a District Commission decision when
the Commission has issued a permit and no hearing was requested or held, or
no motion to alter was filed following the issuance of an administrative
amendment;
(2) a municipal decision regarding whether a particular application
qualifies for a recorded hearing under 24 V.S.A. § 4471(b) shall not be subject
to appeal;
(3) if a District Commission issues a partial decision under subsection
6086(b) of this title, any appeal of that decision must be taken within 30 days
following the date of that decision; and
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division to issue a decision
on a case regarding an appeal of an appropriate municipal panel decision under
24 V.S.A. chapter 117 within 90 days following the close of the hearing; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 24 of 38
(5) except for cases the court considers of greater importance, appeals of
an appropriate municipal panel decision under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 involving
housing development, take precedence on the docket over other cases and shall
be assigned for hearing and trial or for argument accordingly.
* * *
Sec. 10. 24 V.S.A. § 4465 is amended to read:
§ 4465. APPEALS OF DECISIONS OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER
* * *
(b) As used in this chapter, an “interested person” means any one of the
following:
(1) A person owning title to property, or a municipality or solid waste
management district empowered to condemn it or an interest in it, affected by
a bylaw, who alleges that the bylaw imposes on the property unreasonable or
inappropriate restrictions of present or potential use under the particular
circumstances of the case.
(2) The municipality that has a plan or a bylaw at issue in an appeal
brought under this chapter or any municipality that adjoins that municipality.
(3) A person owning or occupying property in the immediate
neighborhood of a property that is the subject of any decision or act taken
under this chapter, who can demonstrate a physical or environmental impact
on the person’s interest under the criteria reviewed, and who alleges that the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 25 of 38
decision or act, if confirmed, will not be in accord with the policies, purposes,
or terms of the plan or bylaw of that municipality.
(4) Any 20 persons who may be any combination of voters, residents, or
real property owners within a municipality listed in subdivision (2) of this
subsection who, by signed petition to the appropriate municipal panel of a
municipality, the plan or a bylaw of which is at issue in any appeal brought
under this title, allege that any relief requested by a person under this title, if
granted, will not be in accord with the policies, purposes, or terms of the plan
or bylaw of that municipality. This petition to the appropriate municipal panel
must designate one person to serve as the representative of the petitioners
regarding all matters related to the appeal. For purposes of this subdivision, an
appeal shall not include the character of the area affected if the project has a
residential component that includes affordable housing.
(5) Any department and administrative subdivision of this State owning
property or any interest in property within a municipality listed in subdivision
(2) of this subsection, and the Agency of Commerce and Community
Development of this State.
* * *
Sec. 11. 24 V.S.A. § 4441 is amended to read:
§ 4441. PREPARATION OF BYLAWS AND REGULATORY TOOLS;
AMENDMENT OR REPEAL

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 26 of 38
* * *
(i) Notwithstanding this section and any other law to the contrary, for
bylaw amendments that are required to comply with amendments to this
chapter, no hearings are required to be held on the bylaw amendments.
* * * LURB Study * * *
Sec. 12. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 11a is amended to read:
Sec. 11a. ACT 250 APPEALS STUDY
(a) On or before January 15, 2026 November 15, 2025, the Land Use
Review Board shall issue a report evaluating whether to transfer appeals of
permit decisions and jurisdictional opinions issued pursuant to 10 V.S.A.
chapter 151 to the Land Use Review Board or whether they should remain at
the Environmental Division of the Superior Court. The Board shall convene a
stakeholder group that at a minimum shall be composed of a representative of
environmental interests, attorneys that practice environmental and
development law in Vermont, the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, the
Vermont Association of Planning and Development Agencies, the Vermont
Chamber of Commerce, the Land Access and Opportunity Board, the Office of
Racial Equity, the Vermont Association of Realtors, a representative of non-
profit housing development interests, a representative of for-profit housing
development interests, a representative of commercial development interests,
an engineer with experience in development, the Agency of Commerce and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 27 of 38
Community Development, and the Agency of Natural Resources in preparing
the report. The Board shall provide notice of the stakeholder meetings on its
website and each meeting shall provide time for public comment.
(b) The report shall at minimum recommend:
(1) whether to allow consolidation of appeals at the Board, or with the
Environmental Division of the Superior Court, and how, including what
resources the Board would need, if transferred to the Board, appeals of permit
decisions issued under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 and the Agency of Natural
Resources can be consolidated with Act 250 appeals;
(2) how to prioritize and expedite the adjudication of appeals related to
housing projects, including the use of hearing officers to expedite appeals and
the setting of timelines for processing of housing appeals;
(3) procedural rules to govern the Board’s administration of Act 250
and the adjudication of appeals of Act 250 decisions. These rules shall include
procedures to create a firewall and eliminate any potential for conflicts with
the Board managing appeals and issuing permit decisions and jurisdictional
opinions; and
(4) other actions the Board should take to promote the efficient and
effective adjudication of appeals, including any procedural improvements to
the Act 250 permitting process and jurisdictional opinion appeals.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 28 of 38
(c) The report shall be submitted to the Senate Committees on Economic
Development, Housing and General Affairs and on Natural Resources and
Energy and the House Committee on Environment and Energy.
* * * Brownfields * * *
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 6641 is amended to read:
§ 6641. BROWNFIELD PROPERTY CLEANUP PROGRAM; CREATION;
POWERS
(a) There is created the Brownfield Property Cleanup Program to enable
certain interested parties to request the assistance of the Secretary to review
and oversee work plans for investigating, abating, removing, remediating, and
monitoring a property in exchange for protection from certain liabilities under
section 6615 of this title. The Program shall be administered by the Secretary
who shall:
* * *
(c) When conducting any review required by this subchapter, the Secretary
shall prioritize the review of remediation at a site that contains housing or that
is planned for the construction or rehabilitation of single-family or multi-
family housing.
Sec. 14. BROWNFIELDS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT; REPORT
On or before November 1, 2025, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
report to the House Committees on Environment and on General and Housing

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 29 of 38
and the Senate Committees on Economic Development, Housing and General
Affairs and on Natural Resources and Energy with proposals to make the
Program established pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 159, subchapter 3
(brownfields reuse and liability limitation) substantially more efficient. At a
minimum, the report shall include both of the following:
(1) A survey of stakeholders in the brownfields program to identify
areas that present challenges to the redevelopment of contaminated properties,
with a focus on redevelopment for housing. The Secretary shall provide
recommendations to resolve these challenges.
(2) An analysis of strengths and weaknesses of implementing a licensed
site professional program within the State. The Secretary shall make a
recommendation on whether such a program should be implemented. If the
Secretary recommends implementation, the report shall include any changes to
statute or budget needed to implement this program.
Sec. 15. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1103, as amended by 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 87, Sec. 43, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.1103 CLIMATE AND ENVIRONMENT – FISCALYEAR 2024
ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
* * *
(h) In fiscal year 2024, the amount of $2,500,000 General Fund is
appropriated to the Department of Environmental Conservation Environmental

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 30 of 38
Contingency Fund established pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 1283 for the
Brownfields Reuse and Environmental Liability Limitation Act as codified in
10 V.S.A. chapter 159. Funds shall be used for the assessment and cleanup,
planning, and cleanup of brownfields sites.
* * *
* * * Taxes * * *
Sec. 16. 24 V.S.A. § 1539 is added to read:
§ 1539. SHORT TERM RENTALMUNICIPALTAXING AUTHORITY
(a) If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote
recommends, the voters of a municipality may, at an annual or special meeting
warned for that purpose, by a majority vote of those present and voting, assess
a one percent taxon short-term rentals as that term is defined in section 2291
of this title.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of any existing provision
of law or municipal charter authorizing a municipality to impose a taxsimilar
to the taxauthorized in this section.
Sec. 16. [Deleted.]
* * * Landlord Certificate * * *
Sec. 17. REPEAL; ACT 181 PROSPECTIVE LANDLORD CERTIFICATE
CHANGES

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 31 of 38
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Secs. 98 (landlord certificate
amendments) and 114(5) (effective date of landlord certificate amendments) is
repealed on passage.
Sec. 18. 32 V.S.A. § 6069 is amended to read:
§ 6069. LANDLORD CERTIFICATE
* * *
(b) The owner of each rental property shall, on or before January 31 of
each year, furnish a certificate of rent to the Department of Taxes.
(c) A certificate under this section shall be in a form prescribed by the
Commissioner and shall include the following:
(1) the name of the each renter,;
(2) the address and any property taxparcel identification number of the
homestead, the information required under subsection (f) of this section, the
School Property Account Number of the rental property;
(3) the name of the owner or landlord of the rental property;
(4) the phone number, email address, and mailing address of the owner
or landlord of the rental property, as available;
(5) the type or types of rental units on the rental property;
(6) the number of rental units on the rental property;
(7) the number of ADA-accessible units on the rental property; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 32 of 38
(8) any additional information that the Commissioner determines is
appropriate.
* * *
(f) Annually on or before October 31, the Department shall prepare and
make available to a member of the public upon request a database in the form
of a sortable spreadsheet that contains the following information for each
rental unit for which the Department received a certificate pursuant to this
section:
(1) name of owner or landlord;
(2) mailing address of landlord;
(3) location of rental unit;
(4) type of rental unit;
(5) number of units in building; and
(6) School Property Account Number. Annually on or before December
15, the Department shall submit a report on the aggregated data collected
under this section to the House Committee on General and Housing and the
Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs.
* * * VHFA Off-Site Construction * * *
Sec. 19. VHFA OFF-SITE CONSTRUCTION REPORT
(a) The sum of $250,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund in
fiscal year 2026 to the Department of Housing and Community Development

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 33 of 38
granted to the Vermont Housing Finance Agency to further develop
recommendations from the 2025 “Opportunities to Utilize Off-Site
Construction to Meet Vermont’s Housing, Workforce and Climate Goals”
report. The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall:
(1) identify and recommend a set of State policy objectives and
priorities related to off-site housing construction;
(2) define the structure and relevant actors for using bulk purchases of
single-and multi-family homes produced through off-site construction to
achieve lower construction costs;
(3) gather input from potential manufacturers about how to best achieve
cost savings through a bulk purchase program;
(4) determine any business planning support needed for existing
Vermont businesses seeking to develop or expand off-site construction;
(5) explore creating a working group of neighboring states that
considers a regional market and shared approach; and
(6) prepare an analysis of the funding and structure needed to support
greater development of off-site homes.
(b) The Vermont Housing Finance Agency shall submit an interim report
on or before January 15, 2026 to the House Committee on General and
Housing and the Senate Committee on Economic Development, Housing and
General Affairs and a final report on December 15, 2026.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 34 of 38
Sec. 19a. VHFA OFF-SITE CONSTRUCTION REPORT;
IMPLEMENTATION
The duty to implement Sec. 19 of this act is contingent upon an
appropriation of funds in fiscal year 2026 from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development for a grant to the
Vermont Housing Finance Agency for the development and issuance of the
report required in that section.
* * * Appropriations * * *
Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT; POSITIONS; APPROPRIATION
(a) Three full-time, classified positions are created in the Department of
Housing and Community Development. The sum of $450,000.00 is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department in fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of funding these positions.
(b) The sum of $300,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Housing and Community Development in fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of funding two existing limited-service positions. One limited-
service position shall provide technical assistance to municipalities, nonprofit
organizations, and private developers to aid in the development of infill and
missing middle-income housing through the Homes for All initiative. One

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 35 of 38
limited-service position shall coordinate funding to distribution amongst State
entities and gather and analyze housing data to ensure efficient use of funds.
Sec. 21. APPROPRIATIONS
The following shall be appropriated from the General Fund in fiscal year
2026:
(1) The sum of $27,000,000.00 to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board for the following purposes:
(A) $25,000,000.00 to provide support and enhance capacity for the
production and preservation of affordable mixed-income rental housing and
homeownership units, including improvements to manufactured homes and
communities, permanent homes and emergency shelter for those experiencing
homelessness, recovery residences, and housing available to farm workers,
refugees, and individuals who are eligible to receive Medicaid-funded home-
and community-based services; and
(B) $2,000,000.00 to implement the Resident Services Program
established in Sec. 88 of 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181.
(2) The sum of $41,735,000.00 to the Department of Housing and
Community Development for the following purposes:
(A) $20,000,000.00 granted to the Vermont Housing Finance Agency
to continue implementation of the Middle-Income Homeownership
Development Program and the Rental Housing Revolving Loan Fund;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 36 of 38
(B) $15,000,000.00 granted to the Vermont Bond Bank to implement
the Vermont Infrastructure Sustainability Fund;
(C) $4,000,000.00 for the rehabilitation of eligible rental housing
units under the Rental Housing Improvement Program established in 10 V.S.A.
§ 699;
(D) $2,000,000.00 to improve mobile home park infrastructure under
the Manufactured Home Improvement and Repair Program established in 10
V.S.A. § 700;
(E) $500,000.00 granted to the five NeighborWorks America
affiliated HomeOwnership Centers for the purpose of providing homebuyer
education, financial literacy counseling, and foreclosure prevention programs;
and
(F) $235,000.00 granted to HomeShare Vermont for the purpose of
funding case management positions and an intake coordinator.
(3) The sum of $400,000.00 to the Agency of Human Services to grant
to Cathedral Square to continue the Support and Services at Home (SASH) for
All pilot program.
(4) The sum of $373,000.00 to the Vermont State Colleges System for
the purpose of supporting the creation of new apprenticeships, curriculum
development, employer partnerships, and faculty training in the field of
heating, ventilation, and air conditioning. The Vermont State Colleges System

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 37 of 38
shall, on or before January 31, 2027, issue a report to the House Committee on
General and Housing and the Senate Committee on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs describing how the funds appropriated pursuant
to this section have been spent, how any remaining funds appropriated
pursuant to this section will be spent, and how the creation of these new
programs have improved workforce development issues in the State.
(5) The sum of $448,500.00 to the Department of Labor to provide a
three-year grant to the Associated General Contractors of Vermont for the
purpose of promoting and expanding their training and certification programs
specific to construction and the building trades. The Associated General
Contractors of Vermont shall, on or before January 31, 2027, issue a report to
the House Committee on General and Housing and the Senate Committee on
Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs describing how the
funds appropriated pursuant to this section have been spent, how any
remaining funds appropriated pursuant to this section will be spent, and how
the expansion of their programs have improved workforce development issues
in the State.
(6) The sum of $625,000.00 to the Department of Health for the
following purposes:
(A) $300,000.00 for funding of at least three new recovery
residences certified by the Vermont Alliance for Recovery Residences; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.479
2025 Page 38 of 38
(B) $325,000.00 to cover first month fees for individuals entering a
certified recovery residence in Vermont.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 22 20. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that Secs. 4 (Universal
Design Study Committee) and 17 (repeal; Act 181 prospective landlord
certificate changes) and this section shall take effect on passage.